South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3082.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 3, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-3-635.  Upon issuance of a rule to show cause pursuant to Rule 14, South Carolina Rules of Family Court, regarding alleged violative acts not more than two years old, the responding party has an automatic right to engage in formal depositions and discovery in responding to the rule to show cause. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----